South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3485.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 11-7-20(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) All state agencies, counties, county agency and office, municipalities, municipal agency or office, all judicial offices, school districts and other entities supported partially or entirely by public funds are subject to audit by or under the oversight of the State Auditor, except as otherwise specifically provided by law. The State Auditor, to the extent practicable and consistent with his overall responsibility, shall audit or cause to be audited each state agency, county, county agency and office, municipality, municipal agency or office, judicial office, school district, and entityother entities supported partially or entirely by public funds annually. SECTION 2.  Sections 4-9-150, 5-7-240, 59-17-100, and 11-7-25 of the S.C. Code are repealed. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----